xall/x60/809689-grammalecte-fr-thunderbird/src/content/dictionaries/fr-FR-classic-reform/fr-FR-classic-reform.aff
FLAG long
SFX b4 Y 191
SFX b4 er er/n'q'd'l'm't's' er
SFX b4 er ant/n'q'l'm't's' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çant/n'q'l'm't's' cer
SFX b4 ecer èce/n'q'j'l'm't's' ecer
SFX b4 emer ème/n'q'j'l'm't's' emer
SFX b4 ener ène/n'q'j'l'm't's' ener
SFX b4 eper èpe/n'q'j'l'm't's' eper
SFX b4 erer ère/n'q'j'l'm't's' erer
SFX b4 eser èse/n'q'j'l'm't's' eser
SFX b4 ever ève/n'q'j'l'm't's' ever
SFX b4 evrer èvre/n'q'j'l'm't's' evrer
SFX b4 eter ète/n'q'j'l'm't's' eter
SFX b4 eler èle/n'q'j'l'm't's' eler
SFX b4 er è/n'q'l'm't' er
SFX b4 ecer èces/n'q'l'm't' ecer
SFX b4 emer èmes/n'q'l'm't' emer
SFX b4 ener ènes/n'q'l'm't' ener
SFX b4 eper èpes/n'q'l'm't' eper
SFX b4 erer ères/n'q'l'm't' erer
SFX b4 eser èses/n'q'l'm't' eser
SFX b4 ever èves/n'q'l'm't' ever
SFX b4 evrer èvres/n'q'l'm't' evrer
SFX b4 eter ètes/n'q'l'm't' eter
SFX b4 eler èles/n'q'l'm't' eler
SFX b4 er ons/n'q'l't' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çons/n'q'l't' cer
SFX b4 er ez/n'q'l'm' er
SFX b4 ecer ècent/n'q'l'm't's' ecer
SFX b4 emer èment/n'q'l'm't's' emer
SFX b4 ener ènent/n'q'l'm't's' ener
SFX b4 eper èpent/n'q'l'm't's' eper
SFX b4 erer èrent/n'q'l'm't's' erer
SFX b4 eser èsent/n'q'l'm't's' eser
SFX b4 ever èvent/n'q'l'm't's' ever
SFX b4 evrer èvrent/n'q'l'm't's' evrer
SFX b4 eter ètent/n'q'l'm't's' eter
SFX b4 eler èlent/n'q'l'm't's' eler
SFX b4 er ais/n'q'j'l'm't' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çais/n'q'j'l'm't' cer
SFX b4 er ait/n'q'l'm't's' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çait/n'q'l'm't's' cer
SFX b4 er ions/n'q'l't' er
SFX b4 er iez/n'q'l'm' er
SFX b4 er aient/n'q'l'm't's' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çaient/n'q'l'm't's' cer
SFX b4 er ai/n'q'j'l'm't' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çai/n'q'j'l'm't' cer
SFX b4 er as/n'q'l'm't' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer ças/n'q'l'm't' cer
SFX b4 er a/n'q'l'm't's' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer ça/n'q'l'm't's' cer
SFX b4 er âmes/n'q'l't' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çâmes/n'q'l't' cer
SFX b4 er âtes/n'q'l'm' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çâtes/n'q'l'm' cer
SFX b4 er èrent/n'q'l'm't's' er
SFX b4 ecer ècerai/n'q'j'l'm't' ecer
SFX b4 emer èmerai/n'q'j'l'm't' emer
SFX b4 ener ènerai/n'q'j'l'm't' ener
SFX b4 eper èperai/n'q'j'l'm't' eper
SFX b4 erer èrerai/n'q'j'l'm't' erer
SFX b4 eser èserai/n'q'j'l'm't' eser
SFX b4 ever èverai/n'q'j'l'm't' ever
SFX b4 evrer èvrerai/n'q'j'l'm't' evrer
SFX b4 eter èterai/n'q'j'l'm't' eter
SFX b4 eler èlerai/n'q'j'l'm't' eler
SFX b4 ecer èceras/n'q'l'm't' ecer
SFX b4 emer èmeras/n'q'l'm't' emer
SFX b4 ener èneras/n'q'l'm't' ener
SFX b4 eper èperas/n'q'l'm't' eper
SFX b4 erer èreras/n'q'l'm't' erer
SFX b4 eser èseras/n'q'l'm't' eser
SFX b4 ever èveras/n'q'l'm't' ever
SFX b4 evrer èvreras/n'q'l'm't' evrer
SFX b4 eter èteras/n'q'l'm't' eter
SFX b4 eler èleras/n'q'l'm't' eler
SFX b4 ecer ècera/n'q'l'm't's' ecer
SFX b4 emer èmera/n'q'l'm't's' emer
SFX b4 ener ènera/n'q'l'm't's' ener
SFX b4 eper èpera/n'q'l'm't's' eper
SFX b4 erer èrera/n'q'l'm't's' erer
SFX b4 eser èsera/n'q'l'm't's' eser
SFX b4 ever èvera/n'q'l'm't's' ever
SFX b4 evrer èvrera/n'q'l'm't's' evrer
SFX b4 eter ètera/n'q'l'm't's' eter
SFX b4 eler èlera/n'q'l'm't's' eler
SFX b4 ecer ècerons/n'q'l't' ecer
SFX b4 emer èmerons/n'q'l't' emer
SFX b4 ener ènerons/n'q'l't' ener
SFX b4 eper èperons/n'q'l't' eper
SFX b4 erer èrerons/n'q'l't' erer
SFX b4 eser èserons/n'q'l't' eser
SFX b4 ever èverons/n'q'l't' ever
SFX b4 evrer èvrerons/n'q'l't' evrer
SFX b4 eter èterons/n'q'l't' eter
SFX b4 eler èlerons/n'q'l't' eler
SFX b4 ecer ècerez/n'q'l'm' ecer
SFX b4 emer èmerez/n'q'l'm' emer
SFX b4 ener ènerez/n'q'l'm' ener
SFX b4 eper èperez/n'q'l'm' eper
SFX b4 erer èrerez/n'q'l'm' erer
SFX b4 eser èserez/n'q'l'm' eser
SFX b4 ever èverez/n'q'l'm' ever
SFX b4 evrer èvrerez/n'q'l'm' evrer
SFX b4 eter èterez/n'q'l'm' eter
SFX b4 eler èlerez/n'q'l'm' eler
SFX b4 ecer èceront/n'q'l'm't's' ecer
SFX b4 emer èmeront/n'q'l'm't's' emer
SFX b4 ener èneront/n'q'l'm't's' ener
SFX b4 eper èperont/n'q'l'm't's' eper
SFX b4 erer èreront/n'q'l'm't's' erer
SFX b4 eser èseront/n'q'l'm't's' eser
SFX b4 ever èveront/n'q'l'm't's' ever
SFX b4 evrer èvreront/n'q'l'm't's' evrer
SFX b4 eter èteront/n'q'l'm't's' eter
SFX b4 eler èleront/n'q'l'm't's' eler
SFX b4 ecer ècerais/n'q'j'l'm't' ecer
SFX b4 emer èmerais/n'q'j'l'm't' emer
SFX b4 ener ènerais/n'q'j'l'm't' ener
SFX b4 eper èperais/n'q'j'l'm't' eper
SFX b4 erer èrerais/n'q'j'l'm't' erer
SFX b4 eser èserais/n'q'j'l'm't' eser
SFX b4 ever èverais/n'q'j'l'm't' ever
SFX b4 evrer èvrerais/n'q'j'l'm't' evrer
SFX b4 eter èterais/n'q'j'l'm't' eter
SFX b4 eler èlerais/n'q'j'l'm't' eler
SFX b4 ecer ècerait/n'q'l'm't's' ecer
SFX b4 emer èmerait/n'q'l'm't's' emer
SFX b4 ener ènerait/n'q'l'm't's' ener
SFX b4 eper èperait/n'q'l'm't's' eper
SFX b4 erer èrerait/n'q'l'm't's' erer
SFX b4 eser èserait/n'q'l'm't's' eser
SFX b4 ever èverait/n'q'l'm't's' ever
SFX b4 evrer èvrerait/n'q'l'm't's' evrer
SFX b4 eter èterait/n'q'l'm't's' eter
SFX b4 eler èlerait/n'q'l'm't's' eler
SFX b4 ecer ècerions/n'q'l't' ecer
SFX b4 emer èmerions/n'q'l't' emer
SFX b4 ener ènerions/n'q'l't' ener
SFX b4 eper èperions/n'q'l't' eper
SFX b4 erer èrerions/n'q'l't' erer
SFX b4 eser èserions/n'q'l't' eser
SFX b4 ever èverions/n'q'l't' ever
SFX b4 evrer èvrerions/n'q'l't' evrer
SFX b4 eter èterions/n'q'l't' eter
SFX b4 eler èlerions/n'q'l't' eler
SFX b4 ecer èceriez/n'q'l'm' ecer
SFX b4 emer èmeriez/n'q'l'm' emer
SFX b4 ener èneriez/n'q'l'm' ener
SFX b4 eper èperiez/n'q'l'm' eper
SFX b4 erer èreriez/n'q'l'm' erer
SFX b4 eser èseriez/n'q'l'm' eser
SFX b4 ever èveriez/n'q'l'm' ever
SFX b4 evrer èvreriez/n'q'l'm' evrer
SFX b4 eter èteriez/n'q'l'm' eter
SFX b4 eler èleriez/n'q'l'm' eler
SFX b4 ecer èceraient/n'q'l'm't's' ecer
SFX b4 emer èmeraient/n'q'l'm't's' emer
SFX b4 ener èneraient/n'q'l'm't's' ener
SFX b4 eper èperaient/n'q'l'm't's' eper
SFX b4 erer èreraient/n'q'l'm't's' erer
SFX b4 eser èseraient/n'q'l'm't's' eser
SFX b4 ever èveraient/n'q'l'm't's' ever
SFX b4 evrer èvreraient/n'q'l'm't's' evrer
SFX b4 eter èteraient/n'q'l'm't's' eter
SFX b4 eler èleraient/n'q'l'm't's' eler
SFX b4 er asse/n'q'j'l'm't' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çasse/n'q'j'l'm't' cer
SFX b4 er asses/n'q'l'm't' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çasses/n'q'l'm't' cer
SFX b4 er ât/n'q'l'm't's' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çât/n'q'l'm't's' cer
SFX b4 er assions/n'q'l't' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çassions/n'q'l't' cer
SFX b4 er assiez/n'q'l'm' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çassiez/n'q'l'm' cer
SFX b4 er assent/n'q'l'm't's' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çassent/n'q'l'm't's' cer
SFX b4 ecer èce/n'l'm't' ecer
SFX b4 emer ème/n'l'm't' emer
SFX b4 ener ène/n'l'm't' ener
SFX b4 eper èpe/n'l'm't' eper
SFX b4 erer ère/n'l'm't' erer
SFX b4 eser èse/n'l'm't' eser
SFX b4 ever ève/n'l'm't' ever
SFX b4 evrer èvre/n'l'm't' evrer
SFX b4 eter ète/n'l'm't' eter
SFX b4 eler èle/n'l'm't' eler
SFX b4 er ons/n'l' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çons/n'l' cer
SFX b4 er ez/n'l'm' er
