xall/x60/809689-grammalecte-fr-thunderbird/src/content/dictionaries/fr-FR-classic-reform/fr-FR-classic-reform.dic
acheter/b4p+
achever/b4p+
amener/b4p+
égrener/b4p+
élever/b4p+
engrener/b4p+
enlever/b4p+
